Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 5. State Training and Employment Program.

Cross references. —

For findings in connection with the enactment of AS

23.15.620

—

23.15.660

by § 2, ch. 116, SLA 1996, see § 1, ch. 116, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For predecessor program, see ch. 95, SLA 1989, as amended by ch. 17, SLA 1991 and ch. 17, SLA 1993. For transitional provision extending the validity of certain regulations in effect on June 30, 2002, that implement AS

23.15.620

—

23.15.660

, despite the amendments to those sections under ch. 86, SLA 2002, see § 52(b), ch. 86, SLA 2002, in the 2002 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For state training and employment program, see 8 AAC 87.

Legislative history reports. —

For Governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 16, SLA 1996 (CSSB 229(L&C)), see 1996 Senate Journal 2181.

Sec. 23.15.620.
State training and employment program.

A program is created in the department to provide grants to eligible persons who provide training and employment assistance services. The purpose of the program is to enhance the quality of in-state job training and employment assistance and to make in-state job training and employment assistance more easily available to employers, employees, and future employees. To foster the success of the program, the department shall, to the greatest extent feasible, combine the resources of the program with resources available outside of the program.

A person who provides training and employment services may apply for a grant from the program and may use the grant to augment or improve public access to the training and employment services provided, including a registered apprenticeship program under 29 U.S.C. 50.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 36 SLA 2009)

Administrative Code. —

For state training and employment program, see 8 AAC 87.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, repealed and reenacted the section, which read, “There is created in the department a program to finance and award grants to employment assistance and training entities. Employment assistance and training entities shall give appropriate state agencies full access to accounting records concerning grants received to assure compliance with program standards.”

Sec. 23.15.625.
Employment assistance and training program account.

The employment assistance and training program account is established in the general fund. The commissioner of administration shall separately account for money collected under AS

23.15.630

that the department deposits in the general fund. The annual estimated balance in the account may be appropriated by the legislature to the department to implement AS

23.15.620

—

23.15.660

. The legislature may appropriate the lapsing balance of the account to the unemployment compensation fund established in AS

23.20.130

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1996)

Sec. 23.15.630.
Special employee unemployment credit and contributions for program.

In the manner provided in AS 23.20, the department shall collect from each employee an amount equal to one-tenth of one percent of the wages, as set out in AS

23.20.175

, on which the employee is required to make contributions under AS

23.20.290(d)

. The department shall remit to the Department of Revenue, in accordance with AS

37.10.050

, money collected under this subsection.

Notwithstanding AS

23.20.290(d)

, the department shall credit each employee with an amount equal to the amount collected from the employee under (a) of this section against unemployment contributions owed by the employee under AS 23.20.

The department shall assess and collect, under AS

23.20.185

—

23.20.275

, interest and penalties for delinquent reports and payments due under this section. Interest and penalties collected shall be handled in accordance with AS

23.20.130(d)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1996)

Sec. 23.15.635.
People to be served.

Within the limits of its grant, an employment assistance and training entity receiving a grant under AS

23.15.620

—

23.15.660

shall provide services set out in AS

23.15.641

to state residents who, immediately before beginning training or receiving benefits under a grant financed by this program,

are unemployed and

are receiving unemployment insurance benefits; or

have exhausted the right to unemployment insurance benefits within the past three years; or

are employed, but liable to be displaced because of

reductions in overall employment within a business;

elimination of the worker’s current job; or

a change in conditions of employment requiring that, to remain employed, the employee must learn substantially different skills that the employee does not now possess.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 36 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

23.15.640

(a)” was substituted for “AS

23.15.640

” to reflect the 2000 enactment of AS 23.15.640(b)-(d).

Administrative Code. —

For state training and employment program, see 8 AAC 87.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in the introductory language substituted “AS

23.15.620

—

23.15.660

” for “AS

23.15.651

” and “AS

23.15.641

” for “AS 23.15.640(a)”; in (2) deleted “within the next six months” following “liable to be displaced”; deleted (3), which related to people who worked in a position covered by AS 23.20 during the past three years and not currently eligible for unemployment benefits for various reasons; made a related stylistic change.

Sec. 23.15.636.
Implementation of program.

The department and the board shall jointly implement the program as follows:

after review and approval by the board, the department shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 to implement AS

23.15.620

—

23.15.660

and to regulate the distribution and accounting of grants awarded under the program;

the department may use financial resources of the program to cover some or all of the department’s cost of administering the program and may also distribute financial resources of the program through grants, the purchase of services or other contracts, or other mechanisms authorized by state law;

the department may enter into interagency agreements with the University of Alaska and other state agencies for the provision of training and employment assistance under the program;

after annual review and approval by the board, the department shall annually establish priorities for the provision of training and employment assistance services under AS

23.15.641

to eligible participants under AS

23.15.643

; in setting priorities, the department shall consider unemployment statistics, unemployment insurance claims, projections of occupational and industrial workforce demand, availability of other training and employment assistance programs, available funding, and other relevant information; when awarding or financing grants under the program, the department may give preference to financing projects and services that train or assist individuals in vocations, businesses, or industries identified in the resident hire report required under AS

36.10.130

as employing a disproportionate percentage of nonresident individuals;

the board shall assist in the evaluation of proposals for grants and make recommendations to the department regarding which grants should be awarded by the program; the department may distribute financial resources of the program to the board to pay for some or all of the board’s costs, existing or anticipated, that are related to evaluating or awarding proposed grants or grants that have been awarded.

History.

(§ 5 ch 36 SLA 2009)

Effective dates. —

Section 10, ch. 36, SLA 2009 makes this section effective June 21, 2009, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 23.15.640.
Services for eligible people; repayment. [Repealed, § 8 ch 36 SLA 2009.]

Sec. 23.15.641.
Eligibility of grantees; use of assistance received.

To be eligible for a grant to help cover the cost of providing training and employment assistance, a person shall

meet or exceed the requirements of AS

23.15.620

—

23.15.660

and regulations adopted under AS

23.15.620

—

23.15.660

;

offer training or employment assistance services that meet the requirements of regulations adopted under AS 23.15.620 — 23.15.660;

be a governmental agency, a private business, an employer, or an organization exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code); and

demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department and the board that

the person’s accounting system is organized and maintained in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, promotes efficiency, ensures compliance with program requirements, and can be audited at the department’s direction with not more than a reasonable amount of effort and expense; and

grants awarded under the program will be used only as allowed under AS 23.15.620 — 23.15.660.

A recipient of a grant awarded under the program may use the grant to provide any of the following training and employment assistance services to eligible participants:

industry-specific training;

on-the-job training, including apprentice training in a registered apprenticeship program under 29 U.S.C. 50;

institutional or classroom job-linked training;

support services, including financial allowances and relocation expenses that the department determines are reasonably necessary to enable an eligible participant to receive training and employment assistance;

assistance considered necessary to help an eligible participant obtain or retain a job for which training and employment assistance provided under the program has prepared the eligible participant;

purchases of basic tools, work clothing, safety gear, or other items the eligible participant needs to obtain or retain a job for which training and employment assistance provided under the program has prepared the eligible participant;

other costs the department determines are necessary to pay in order that an eligible participant can receive training or employment assistance or obtain or retain a job for which the training and employment assistance provided under the program has prepared the eligible participant.

The department may allow payment for items described in (b) of this section if the department determines that alternative sources of financing have been exhausted or are unavailable to the eligible participant or that a grant from the program is otherwise required so that, when combined with other available financing, the grant will enable an eligible participant to receive training or employment assistance approved by the department.

History.

(§ 6 ch 36 SLA 2009)

Effective dates. —

Section 10, ch. 36, SLA 2009 makes this section effective June 21, 2009, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 23.15.643.
Eligibility of program participants.

The department and a person awarded a grant under the program may use the grant only to provide training and employment assistance services to eligible participants. To be an eligible participant, the person may be employed or employable and shall, at the time of application for training or employment assistance under the program,

be a resident of the state;

have worked in a position covered by AS 23.20, or similar provisions in another state, at any time during the five years immediately preceding the application; and

need training to improve the person’s prospects for obtaining or retaining employment.

History.

(§ 6 ch 36 SLA 2009)

Effective dates. —

Section 10, ch. 36, SLA 2009 makes this section effective June 21, 2009, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 23.15.645.
Duties and powers of the department. [Repealed, § 8 ch 36 SLA 2009.]

Sec. 23.15.650.
Work Incentive Program for Welfare Recipients. [Repealed, § 7 ch 128 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 23.15.651.
Duties of Alaska Workforce Investment Board; grants; eligible entities. [Repealed, § 8 ch 36 SLA 2009.]

Sec. 23.15.652.
Program accountability.

The department and a person who is awarded a grant to provide training and employment assistance services under the program shall comply with state and federal laws and maintain records, including accounting records, as required by those laws.

The department may allocate or authorize the expenditure of not more than 20 percent of the amount appropriated to the program for a fiscal year to pay for administration of the program by the department and the board.

The department shall annually prepare and present to the board a report concerning the program and notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 7 ch 36 SLA 2009)

Effective dates. —

Section 10, ch. 36, SLA 2009 makes this section effective June 21, 2009, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 23.15.654.
Appeals.

The department shall adopt regulations that provide for an appeal of a denial of a grant application under AS

23.15.620

—

23.15.660

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 36 SLA 2009)

Effective dates. —

Section 10, ch. 36, SLA 2009 makes this section effective June 21, 2009, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 23.15.660.
Definitions.

In AS

23.15.620

—

23.15.660

,

“board” means the Alaska Workforce Investment Board established in AS

23.15.550

;

“program” means the state training and employment program established in AS

23.15.620

—

23.15.660

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1996; am § 25 ch 58 SLA 1999; am §§ 17, 18, 46 ch 86 SLA 2002; am § 6 ch 49 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was reorganized in 2002 and 2008 to place the defined terms in alphabetical order.

Administrative Code. —

For state training and employment program, see 8 AAC 87.

Secs. 23.15.700 — 23.15.810.
Business incentive training program. [Repealed, § 6 ch 49 SLA 2003.]